Utah, session 2026, HB334.
Section 1. Section 36-36-101 is enacted to read:36. Legislative Education Support and Professional Development Commission36-36-101. Definitions.(1)"Commission" means the Legislative Education Support and Professional Development Commission.(2)"LEA" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53E-1-102.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 36-36-102 is enacted to read:36-36-102. Legislative Education Support and Professional Development Commission created -- Membership -- Terms.(1)There is created the Legislative Education Support and Professional Development Commission to:(a)study gaps in communication, coordination, and support among the state board, the Legislature, LEAs, and individual educators;(b)evaluate professional development and support services available to educators outside of existing membership-based organizations;(c)assess opportunities for innovation in educator recognition, professional advancement, and accountability; and(d)make recommendations to the Education Interim Committee regarding legislative solutions to address the issues described in Subsections (1)(a) through (c).(2)The commission membership shall include:(a)three members of the Senate, whom the president of the Senate appoints, with at least one from each political party and one member whose district covers counties of the fourth, fifth, and sixth class;(b)three members of the House of Representatives, whom the speaker of the House of Representatives appoints, with at least one from each political party and one member whose district covers counties of the fourth, fifth, and sixth class;(c)the state superintendent or the state superintendent's designee;(d)one member of the State Board of Education, whom the chair of the State Board of Education appoints;(e)one member who is a superintendent of a school district, whom the Utah School Superintendents Association appoints;(f)one member who is a director of a charter school, whom the chair of the State Board of Education appoints;(g)two members who are currently employed as teachers in the state, one from a school in a county of the fourth, fifth or sixth class, whom the president of the Senate and the speaker of the House of Representatives jointly appoint;(h)one member who is a member of a local school board, whom the Utah School Boards Association appoints;(i)the director of the Division of Risk Management or the director's designee; and(j)one member with expertise in educator professional development or educator professional organizations, whom the president of the Senate and the speaker of the House of Representatives jointly appoint.(3)The president of the Senate shall designate one member of the Senate appointed under Subsection (2)(a) to serve as a cochair of the commission.(4)The speaker of the House of Representatives shall designate one member of the House of Representatives appointed under Subsection (2)(b) to serve as a cochair of the commission.(5)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (5)(b), a member of the commission described in Subsection (2) shall serve a term that ends on the commission's repeal date described in Section 63I-1-236.(b)When a vacancy occurs in the commission membership for any reason, the appointing authority for the vacant position shall appoint a replacement for the unexpired term within 30 days after the day on which the vacancy occurs.(6)The Office of Legislative Research and General Counsel shall provide staff support to the commission.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 36-36-103 is enacted to read:36-36-103. Duties and powers of commission -- Quorum -- Compensation.(1)The commission shall:(a)hold the commission's first meeting before October 1, 2026;(b)study the issues described in Subsections 36-36-102(1)(a) through (d);(c)examine gaps in communication, coordination, and support among the state board, the Legislature, LEAs, and individual educators, including:(i) current mechanisms for educators to communicate concerns, ideas, and feedback to:(A)the State Board of Education;(B)the state superintendent;(C)legislative committees; and(D)local school boards and LEA administration;(ii)barriers that prevent effective communication between the entities described in Subsection (1)(c)(i);(iii)the frequency and effectiveness of current communication channels;(iv)whether educators feel adequately represented in education policy decisions at the state and local level; and(v)best practices from other states for facilitating educator input in policy development;(d)examine professional development and support services available to educators, including:(i)current professional development opportunities provided by:(A)the state board;(B)LEAs;(C)institutions of higher education;(D)professional organizations; and(E)private providers;(ii)gaps in professional development services, particularly for educators who are not members of professional organizations;(iii)teacher leadership and advancement opportunities outside of administrative positions;(iv)mentorship and peer support programs for early-career and experienced educators;(v)innovative professional development models from other states or sectors; and(vi)potential state-supported professional development programs or networks;(e)examine educator recognition, accountability, and innovation, including:(i)current programs that recognize and reward effective teaching and innovative classroom practices;(ii)gaps in recognition and incentive systems for educators;(iii)measures of teacher effectiveness beyond student test scores;(iv)opportunities to promote innovation and experimentation in instructional methods;(v)accountability mechanisms that focus on student growth and professional excellence; and(vi)potential state-supported programs for educator recognition or grants for classroom innovation;(f)consult with:(i)the State Board of Education;(ii)representatives of LEAs;(iii)teachers who are members of professional organizations and teachers who are not members of professional organizations;(iv)representatives of educator professional development organizations; and(v)other stakeholders the commission cochairs determine are relevant to the commission's work;(g)identify potential state resources, programs, or agencies that could provide or coordinate services to support educators;(h)identify statutory or regulatory changes needed to implement the commission's recommendations; and(i)before November 1, 2027, submit a written report to the Education Interim Committee that includes:(i)the commission's findings;(ii)recommendations for legislative action; and(iii)any proposed legislation the commission develops.(2) The commission may:(a)meet as often as the commission cochairs determine is necessary to fulfill the commission's duties;(b)establish subcommittees to study specific issues related to the commission's duties; and(c)request information, data, or assistance from:(i)the State Board of Education;(ii)the state superintendent;(iii)LEAs;(iv)the Division of Risk Management;(v)the Utah Education and Telehealth Network; and(vi)other state agencies or entities the commission determines are relevant.(3)(a)A majority of the members of the commission constitutes a quorum.(b)The commission shall take an action by majority vote of a quorum of the commission.(4)(a)A member of the commission who is a legislator shall receive compensation and expenses in accordance with Section 36-2-2 and Legislative Joint Rules, Title 5, Legislative Compensation and Expenses.(b)A member of the commission who is not a legislator and who is an employee of the state may not receive compensation in addition to the member's regular state compensation for the member's service on the commission.(c)A member of the commission who is not a legislator and who is not an employee of the state may receive:(i)per diem compensation at the rate established by the Division of Finance under Section 63A-3-107 for each day the member attends a meeting of the commission; and(ii)reimbursement for travel expenses incurred in attending a meeting of the commission at the rates established by the Division of Finance under Section 63A-3-107 and rules made by the Division of Finance under Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 63I-1-236 is amended to read:63I-1-236. Repeal dates: Title 36.(1)Title 36, Chapter 17, Legislative Process Committee, is repealed January 1, 2028.(2)Section 36-29-111, Public Safety Data Management Task Force, is repealed July 1, 2029.(3)Title 36, Chapter 28, Veterans and Military Affairs Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(4)Section 36-29-112, Justice Court Reform Task Force, is repealed July 1, 2025.(5)Title 36, Chapter 36, Legislative Education Support and Professional Development Commission, is repealed March 15, 2028.

Section 5:
Section 5.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.